Utah statutes.
20A-3-201.5.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Challenged voter" means a person whose right to vote is challenged as provided in this part.

(2)  "Filer" means a person who files a written statement challenging another person's right to vote as provided in Section 20A-3-202.3.



Enacted by Chapter 83, 2010 General Session

